Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-2907
Funding; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund to the State Department of Education each fiscal year. Such funds shall be used for purposes of supporting the program, including, but not limited to, salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes.

Laws 2021, LB396, § 7.
August 28, 2021